Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.130

Writ—Notation of time received—Order of execution.

The sheriff or other officer shall indorse upon the writ of attachment in ink the day, hour, and minute when the writ first came into the officer's hands. Where there are several attachments against the same defendant, they shall be executed in the order in which they were received by the sheriff.

[ 1987 c 442 s 813; 1886 p 41 s 11; RRS s 657. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.110.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 64.